Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Low-Income Energy Assistance Trust Fund

42.560.
Energy assistance trust fund — Allocation of interest.

There is established in the Treasury of the Commonwealth a trust fund to be known as the “Energy Assistance Trust Fund” referred to in KRS

42.560

to

42.572

as the “trust fund.”

The trust fund shall consist of any oil overcharge refunds which become available to the state as a result of litigation for alleged overcharges for crude oil or refined petroleum products sold during the period of time in which federal price controls on such products were in effect, any moneys as may be appropriated by the general fund, and any investment interest earned on the fund.

The fund shall be managed by the state Office of Financial Management within the Office of the Controller and all moneys in excess of the amount to be disbursed in a given fiscal year shall be invested to maximize returns. The principal and any interest earnings of the trust fund shall at no time lapse to the general fund.

The accumulated interest shall be made available as follows:

Fifty percent (50%) to the Finance and Administration Cabinet to be allocated to weatherization services to low-income households; and

Fifty percent (50%) to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to be allocated to low-income energy assistance services.

The funds to be available for expenditure in any fiscal year shall be appropriated by the General Assembly from the trust fund as provided in KRS

48.300

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 262, § 1, effective April 3, 1986; 1988, ch. 10, § 1, effective February 19, 1988; 1990, ch. 321, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 426, § 81, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 46, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 56, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 102, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 69, § 5, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 8, effective July 12, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2012). This statute was amended by 2012 Ky. Acts chs. 69 and 158, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(7/12/2012). 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 158, sec. 82, provides: “The Finance and Administration Cabinet, which is assigned the functions, duties, and responsibilities associated with the administration of the weatherization program operated in accordance with the requirements for funding received from the United States Department of Energy and any subordinate entities in Executive Order 2011-353 and this Act, is hereby authorized to engage and contract with the Kentucky Housing Corporation to operate and manage the weatherization program if the cabinet deems it to be in the best interest of the weatherization program and the Commonwealth of Kentucky.”

42.562.
Low-income energy assistance trust fund board. [Repealed.]

42.564.
Review of investments — Estimate of funds available. [Repealed.]

42.566.
Energy assistance trust fund — Allocation of appropriations.

The funds appropriated by the General Assembly from the energy assistance trust fund shall be expended in a manner consistent with the judgments and settlements, as amended, which produced the oil overcharge refunds, as follows:

The sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or eight percent (8%) of the amount appropriated each fiscal year, whichever is greater, shall be distributed annually to the Energy and Environment Cabinet for expenditure in the Institutional Conservation Program established pursuant to Part G of Title III of the Energy Policy and Conservation Act, 42

U.S.C. secs. 6371

et seq. The source of these funds shall be deemed to be the trust funds produced by the Stripper Well litigation, In Re Department of Energy Stripper Well Exemption Litigation, D.C. Kan., M.D.L. No. 378, and the Diamond Shamrock litigation, Diamond Shamrock Refining Co. v. Standard Oil of Indiana, D.C. Ind., Civil Action No. C-84-1432, and interest accumulated thereon; and

The balance of the trust funds appropriated for expenditure in any fiscal year shall be distributed as follows:

Forty percent (40%) to the Finance and Administration Cabinet to be allocated to the cabinet’s program for weatherization of low-income households established pursuant to Part A of the Energy Conservation and Existing Buildings Act of 1976, 42

U.S.C. secs. 6861

et seq.; and

Sixty percent (60%) to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to be allocated to the cabinet’s program for energy crisis or prevention services for low-income households established pursuant to the Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Act of 1981, 42

U.S.C. secs. 8621

et seq.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 262, § 4, effective April 3, 1986; 1988, ch. 10, § 2, effective February 19, 1988; 1990, ch. 325, § 23, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 426, § 82, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 103, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 33, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 69, § 6, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 9, effective July 12, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2012). This statute was amended by 2012 Ky. Acts chs. 69 and 158, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(7/12/2012). 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 158, sec. 82, provides: “The Finance and Administration Cabinet, which is assigned the functions, duties, and responsibilities associated with the administration of the weatherization program operated in accordance with the requirements for funding received from the United States Department of Energy and any subordinate entities in Executive Order 2011-353 and this Act, is hereby authorized to engage and contract with the Kentucky Housing Corporation to operate and manage the weatherization program if the cabinet deems it to be in the best interest of the weatherization program and the Commonwealth of Kentucky.”

(6/8/2011). The Reviser of Statutes has corrected the internal numbering of subdivisions of this statute from the way they appeared in 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 24, sec. 33, under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

42.568.
Withdrawal of funds. [Repealed.]

42.570.
Limitation on expenditures. [Repealed.]

42.572.
Annual status report.

The State Office of Financial Management shall prepare and submit to the Legislative Research Commission a report by July 30 of each year on the operational and financial status of the fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 262, § 7, effective April 3, 1986; 1988, ch. 10, § 3, effective February 19, 1988; 1990, ch. 321, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 2000, ch. 46, § 11, effective July 14, 2000.

42.574.
Administrative regulations. [Repealed.]